Washington statutes.
RCW 19.29.020

Copy of chapter to be posted.

A copy of this chapter printed in a legible manner shall be kept posted in a conspicuous place in all electric plants, stations and storerooms.

[ 1913 c 130 s 2; RRS s 5436.] [1954 SLC-RO-29.]